District of Columbia statutes.
38-2061.01

Employment of retired teachers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the salary of any retired teacher who first becomes entitled to an annuity under this subchapter after November 17, 1979, and who is subsequently employed by the government of the District of Columbia shall be reduced by such amount as is necessary to provide that the sum of such teacher’s annuity under part A of subchapter II of this chapter and compensation for such employment is equal to the salary otherwise payable for the position held by such teacher. No salary subject to this reduction shall be reduced to less than any applicable minimum wage set forth in the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1060; 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), or any other applicable federal minimum wage statute or regulation.

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 875, ch. 779, § 25
as added Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 922, Pub. L. 96-122, § 257
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-198, § 5, 61 DCR 12450
District of Columbia retirement board, members entitled to compensation exempt from provisions of this section, see § 1-711.
This section is referenced in § 1-711.
1981 Ed., § 31-1245.
1973 Ed., § 31-739f.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-198 added the last sentence.